Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1709
Project, defined.

Project shall mean that fixed capital outlay, study, or planning activity, except renewal work as defined in section 81-173, described in the public notice of a state agency.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 9.